Indiana, session 2026, HB1280.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 24-5-24.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 24.6. Social Security Number Search Requests
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to a consumer reporting agency that
compiles and maintains files on consumers on a nationwide basis.
Sec. 2. (a) As used in this chapter, "consumer" means an
individual whose principal residence is in Indiana.
(b) The term includes the following:
(1) A protected consumer (as defined in IC 24-5-24.5-4).
(2) A representative acting on behalf of an individual
described in subdivision (1).
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "consumer report" means any
written, oral, or other communication of any information that:
(1) is made by a consumer reporting agency;
(2) bears on a consumer's creditworthiness, credit standing,
credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal
2026 IN 1280—LS 6956/DI 101


characteristics, or mode of living; and
(3) is used or expected to be used or collected in whole or in
part for the purpose of serving as a factor in establishing a
consumer's eligibility for credit to be used primarily for
personal, family, or household purposes.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "consumer reporting agency"
means any person that, for monetary fees or dues, or on a
cooperative nonprofit basis, regularly engages in whole or in part
in the practice of assembling or evaluating information concerning
a consumer's credit or other information for the purpose of
furnishing a consumer report to another person.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "consumer reporting agency that
compiles and maintains files on consumers on a nationwide basis"
has the meaning set forth in 15 U.S.C. 1681a(p).
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "file", when used in connection
with information on a consumer, means all the information on that
consumer that is recorded and retained by a consumer reporting
agency, regardless of how the information is stored.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "proper identification", with
respect to a Social Security number search request, means all of
the following for the consumer to whom the request pertains:
(1) The consumer's Social Security number.
(2) The consumer's first and last name.
(3) The consumer's date of birth.
Sec. 8. As used in this chapter, "Social Security number search
request" refers to a request that:
(1) is made by a consumer to a consumer reporting agency in
conjunction with a request made under 15 U.S.C. 1681g for
information in the consumer's file; and
(2) requests that the consumer reporting agency conduct a
search of all files maintained by the consumer reporting
agency to determine if the consumer's Social Security
number:
(A) as supplied by the consumer in connection with the
request; and
(B) as verified by the consumer reporting agency as
belonging to the consumer;
is associated with one (1) or more files not associated with the
consumer.
Sec. 9. (a) After December 31, 2026, upon receiving a Social
Security number search request from a consumer, a consumer
reporting agency shall fulfill the consumer's Social Security
2026 IN 1280—LS 6956/DI 101


number search request if the consumer reporting agency:
(1) maintains a file on the consumer; and
(2) receives:
(A) proper identification from the consumer; and
(B) the consumer's written and signed consent for the
consumer reporting agency to verify with the federal
Social Security Administration that the consumer's Social
Security number belongs to the consumer. A consent that
is in an electronic form and that includes the consumer's
electronic signature constitutes written and signed consent
for purposes of this clause.
(b) In fulfilling a Social Security number search request that
satisfies the conditions set forth in subsection (a), a consumer
reporting agency shall do the following:
(1) Verify with the federal Social Security Administration that
the Social Security number supplied by the consumer in
connection with the request belongs to the consumer.
(2) Conduct a search of all files maintained by the consumer
reporting agency to determine if the consumer's Social
Security number is associated with one (1) or more files not
associated with the consumer.
(3) Include the following as part of the information provided
to the consumer in connection with the consumer's request
under 15 U.S.C. 1681g:
(A) A statement as to whether the results of the consumer
reporting agency's search under subdivision (2) indicate
that the consumer's Social Security number is associated
with one (1) or more files not associated with the
consumer.
(B) If the consumer reporting agency's search indicates
that the consumer's Social Security number is associated
with one (1) or more files not associated with the
consumer, the following information:
(i) The number of files (not including the consumer's file)
associated with the consumer's Social Security number.
(ii) An identification of each person that procured a
consumer report in connection with each file (not
including the consumer's file) associated with the
consumer's Social Security number during the one (1)
year period immediately preceding the date of
submission of the consumer's Social Security number
search request. For each person identified, the consumer
2026 IN 1280—LS 6956/DI 101


reporting agency must include the person's name, full
trade name under which the person does business (if
applicable), address, telephone number, and information
as to whether the person has reported any information
to the consumer reporting agency in connection with the
file associated with the consumer's Social Security
number and, if so, any account or transaction numbers
included with that information.
Sec. 10. A consumer reporting agency may not:
(1) charge a consumer an additional fee in connection with a
Social Security number search request made by the
consumer;
(2) increase any fee lawfully imposed in connection with the
consumer's request under 15 U.S.C. 1681g because the
consumer's request under 15 U.S.C. 1681g includes a Social
Security number search request; or
(3) charge a consumer a fee in connection with the consumer's
request under 15 U.S.C. 1681g because the consumer's
request under 15 U.S.C. 1681g includes a Social Security
number search request, if the consumer is entitled under 15
U.S.C. 1681j to receive the disclosures under 15 U.S.C. 1681g
without charge.
Sec. 11. The federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. 1681
et seq.) does not annul, alter, affect, or exempt a consumer
reporting agency subject to this chapter from complying with this
chapter, except to the extent that this section is inconsistent with
any provision of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C.
1681 et seq.), and then only to the extent of the inconsistency, as
provided in 15 U.S.C. 1681t(a).
2026 IN 1280—LS 6956/DI 101